Maryland, session 2025, HB0256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
2–201.
There is a State Board of Examiners for Audiologists, Hearing Aid Dispensers,
Speech–Language Pathologists, and Music Therapists in the Department.
2–502.
Subject to the evaluation and reestablishment provisions of the Maryland Program
Evaluation Act, this title and all rules and regulations adopted under this title shall
terminate and be of no effect after July 1, [2026] 2031.
– 1 –

Ch. 31 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
6–201.
There is a State Board of Massage Therapy Examiners in the Department.
6–202.
(a) (1) The Board consists of [seven] NINE members.
(2) Of the [seven] NINE Board members:
(i) [Five] SIX shall be licensed massage therapists; and
(ii) [Two] THREE shall be consumer members.
(3) (i) The Governor shall appoint the licensed massage therapist
members with the advice of the Secretary, and the advice and consent of the Senate of
Maryland, from a list of names of qualified individuals submitted to the Secretary and the
Governor by an association that represents at least 250 licensed massage therapists in the
State.
(ii) The number of names on the list shall be five times the number
of vacancies.
(iii) The list shall include the name of the incumbent member unless
the incumbent member declines renomination.
(4) The Governor shall appoint the consumer members with the advice of
the Secretary and the advice and consent of the Senate of Maryland.
(b) (1) Each licensed massage therapist member shall be:
(i) A resident of the State;
(ii) A licensed massage therapist of integrity and ability who is in
active practice;
(iii) A graduate of a Board–approved program in massage therapy;
and
(iv) An individual who has practiced massage therapy in the State
for at least 5 consecutive years before appointment.
(2) (i) In this paragraph, “good standing” means that the Board has not
reprimanded the licensed massage therapist, suspended or revoked the license of the
licensed massage therapist, or placed the licensed massage therapist on probation within
5 years before or after confirmation to the Board.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 31
(ii) In addition to the requirements of paragraph (1) of this
subsection, each licensed massage therapy member of the Board shall be in good standing
with the Board.
6–602.
Subject to the evaluation and reestablishment provisions of the Maryland Program
Evaluation Act, this title and all regulations adopted under this title shall terminate and
be of no effect after July 1, [2026] 2031.
12–201.
There is a State Board of Pharmacy in the Department.
12–802.
Subject to the evaluation and reestablishment provisions of the MARYLAND
Program Evaluation Act, this title and all rules and regulations adopted under this title
shall terminate and be of no effect after July 1, [2025] 2030.
17–201.
There is a State Board of Professional Counselors and Therapists.
17–6A–05.
There is a Behavior Analyst Advisory Committee within the Board.
17–6A–31.
Subject to the evaluation and reestablishment provisions of the Maryland Program
Evaluation Act, this subtitle and all rules and regulations adopted under this subtitle shall
terminate and be of no effect after July 1, [2026] 2031 2028.
17–702.
Subject to the evaluation and reestablishment provisions of the Maryland Program
Evaluation Act, this title and all rules or regulations adopted under this title shall
terminate and be of no effect after July 1, [2026] 2031 2028.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That notwithstanding § 6–202(f)(1)
of the Health Occupations Article, the initial terms of the additional members of the State
Board of Massage Therapy Examiners appointed under § 6–202(a) of the Health
Occupations Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, shall expire in 2030.
– 3 –

Ch. 31 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 4 –